Wisconsin, session 2025, SB820.
do enact as follows:SB820,14Section 1. 115.31 (2c) of the statutes is created to read:SB820,2,25115.31 (2c) The state superintendent, or their designee, may issue a 6subpoena, in substantially the form authorized under s. 885.02, to compel the 7appearance of a witness or the production of a relevant document or item to aid in 1an investigation relating to the revocation of a license granted by the state 2superintendent for incompetency or immoral conduct under sub. (2). SB820,23Section 2. 885.01 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB820,2,54885.01 (6) By the state superintendent of public instruction, or their designee, 5as provided under s. 115.31 (2c).SB820,2,66